Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1658
Alteration of dam; owner; filing requirements; approval to operate; issuance.

(1) Upon completion of the alteration of any dam, the owner shall file with the Chief Water Officer a completion certification accompanied by supplementary drawings or descriptive matter, as determined by the Chief Water Officer, signed and sealed by the design engineer, showing or describing the work as actually completed.

(2) An approval to operate shall be issued upon a finding by the Chief Water Officer that the dam is safe to impound within the limitations prescribed in the application approval. Pending issuance of a new or revised approval to operate, the owner of the dam shall not cause the dam to impound beyond the limitations prescribed in the existing application approval.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 58;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 296.